District of Columbia statutes.
1-604.08

Oath of office.

Each personnel authority of an agency of the District shall designate a person to administer the oath of office to each employee of that agency. The oath shall be as follows:

“I, (employee’s name) do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully execute the laws of the United States of America and of the District of Columbia, and will, to the best of my ability, preserve, protect and defend the Constitution of the United States, and will faithfully discharge the duties of the office on which I am about to enter.”

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 408, 25 DCR 5740
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 36(a), 35 DCR 147
Statehood Constitutional Convention initiative, oaths of representatives and senators, see § 1-123.
Economic Development Finance Corporation, personnel administration, see § 2-1207.06.
Election campaigns, conflict of interest, disclosure, see § 1-1106.02.
Merit system, coverage, agreements to provide coverage, see § 1-602.01.
Merit system, educational employees, coverage, see § 1-602.03.
Merit system, educational service, rules and regulations, see § 1-608.01a.
Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.
Organization for personnel management, rules and regulations, see § 1-604.04.
Public employee relations board, transfer of property, personnel and cases, see § 1-605.03.
Washington Convention Center Authority, application of this subchapter, see § 10-1202.16.
This section is referenced in § 1-123 and § 1-602.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-604.8.
1973 Ed., § 1-334.8.